Nebraska, session 109, LB1201.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1201 LB1201
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-1021, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1021 (1) The Education Future Fund is created. The fund shall be
administered by the department and shall consist of money transferred to
the fund by the Legislature. Transfers may be made from the Education
Future Fund to the Computer Science and Technology Education Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Education Future Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The fund shall be used only for the following purposes, in order
of priority:
(a) To fully fund equalization aid under the Tax Equity and
Educational Opportunities Support Act;
(b) To fund reimbursements related to special education under
section 79-1142;
(c) To fund foundation aid under the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Support Act;
(d) To increase funding for school districts in a way that results
in direct property tax relief, which means a dollar-for-dollar
replacement of property taxes by a state funding source;
(e) To provide funding for a grant program created by the
Legislature to address teacher turnover rates and keep existing teachers
in classrooms;
(f) To provide funding to increase career and technical educational
classroom opportunities for students, including, but not limited to,
computer science education. Such funding must provide students with the
academic and technical skills, knowledge, and training necessary to
succeed in future careers;
(g) To provide funding for a grant program created by the
Legislature to provide students the opportunity to have a mentor who will
-2-

LB1201 LB1201
2026 2026
continuously engage with the student directly to aid in the student's
professional growth and give ongoing support and encouragement to the
student;
(h) To provide funding for extraordinary increases in special
education expenditures to allow school districts with large, unexpected
special education expenditures to more easily meet the needs of all
students;
(i) To provide funding to help recruit teachers throughout the state
by utilizing apprenticeships through a teacher apprenticeship program and
an alternative certification process;
(j) To provide funding to develop and implement a professional
learning system to help provide sustained professional learning and
training regarding evidence-based reading instruction and for a grant
program relating to dyslexia research; and
(k) To provide funding for a grant program related to the Nebraska
Reading Improvement Act as provided in section 3 of this act; and
(l) (k) To provide funding for a pilot project administered by the
State Department of Education to provide menstrual products to school
districts.
(3)(a) The State Treasurer shall transfer one billion dollars from
the General Fund to the Education Future Fund in fiscal year 2023-24, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(b) The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred fifty million
dollars from the General Fund to the Education Future Fund in fiscal year
2024-25, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that two hundred fifty
million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the Education
Future Fund in fiscal year 2025-26 and each fiscal year thereafter.
-3-

LB1201 LB1201
2026 2026
Sec. 2. Section 79-2601, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2601 Sections 79-2601 to 79-2607 and section 3 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Reading Improvement Act.
Sec. 3. (1) For the 2026-27 and 2027-28 school years and subject to
available appropriations, the State Department of Education shall develop
and administer a grant program to provide high-quality, age-appropriate
classroom libraries and monthly parent or caregiver engagement materials
in cooperation with a Nebraska-based nonprofit organization with at least
ten years of experience in book distribution.
(2) Priority for grants shall be given to any application from a
school district:
(a) That is in the lowest performance classification under the
accountability system developed pursuant to section 79-760.06;
(b) In which forty percent of the students are poverty students as
defined in section 79-1003; or
(c) In which a higher than average percentage of students in
kindergarten through grade five are identified as having a reading
deficiency.
(3) The department shall provide a recommended list of high-quality
books, covering a variety of topics, subjects, and genres in at least
English and Spanish, for each participating elementary classroom.
(4) Each participating elementary classroom shall track:
(i) Book circulation totals;
(ii) Available books, including the title, author, publisher, and
International Standard Book Number for each book;
(iii) Student enrollment numbers; and
(iv) The total number of books taken home by each student.
(5) The department shall also assist school districts in selecting
or developing parent or caregiver engagement materials for each student
in a participating classroom to take home each month.
-4-

LB1201 LB1201
2026 2026
(6) On or before December 1, 2028, the State Department of Education
shall submit a report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature and
the Education Committee of the Legislature relating to the grant program.
The report shall include, to the extent possible, quantitative and
qualitative metrics based on statewide assessments administered pursuant
to section 79-760.03, assessments administered under the Nebraska Reading
Improvement Act, and classroom assessments of reading proficiency,
reading skills, or literacy acquisition.
(7) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate up to one
million dollars from the Education Future Fund each fiscal year for
fiscal years 2026-27 and 2027-28 to the State Department of Education to
carry out this section. Such appropriation shall only be used for:
(a) Purchase and delivery of books;
(b) Development and delivery of engagement materials;
(c) Direct program staffing;
(d) Evaluation of the pilot; and
(e) Administrative expenses of up to ten percent of the
appropriation.
(8) The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 4. Original sections 79-1021 and 79-2601, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-5-